Massachusetts, session 194th, S1241.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 48 of Chapter 127, as appearing in section 80 of chapter 69 of the acts of 2018, is
hereby amended by striking the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following:-
The commissioner and administrators of state prisons and county facilities shall
maximize a diverse range of educational programming for all emerging adults, ages 18-25. The
commissioner shall ensure that at least one educational program leading to the award of a high
school equivalency certificate including high school equivalency testing opportunities, and credit
that can be applied to high school graduation, is available to persons who are committed to the
custody of the department or to a county correctional facility and who have not obtained a high
school degree or equivalency. In addition to each such facility providing at least one general high
school equivalency (HiSet) class and high school equivalency testing opportunities and classes
of 2

that can earn credit toward high school graduation, each facility shall also include specialized,
age-appropriate educational classes for emerging adults, including all individuals ages 18 thru
25, for both individuals who have and have not obtained a high school degree or equivalency,
including but not limited to college readiness and college credit classes, and/or workforce
readiness and vocational classes. Access to workforce development, vocational and employment
training opportunities in the community shall be maximized as available. All emerging adults
shall have the opportunity to access at least four hours of programming daily at least five days a
week; at least four hours daily shall be for programming that will be out of cell and congregate,
meaning more than one person together without barriers between them to ensure the most
conducive educational learning environment. Time allowed for in-cell learning through tablets
shall be maximized and considered as additional time toward the already required daily four
hours of out of cell learning. Preference for all educational programming will be provided for
innovations in the delivery of such programming that include, but not limited to, partnerships
with nonprofits and educational institutions that specialize in serving emerging adults and draw
upon the talents of staff with lived experiences similar to those incarcerated.
of 2